Maryland, session 2026, SB0128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–702.
(a) This section applies to ALL UNITS OF the [Maryland Defense Force and the
National Guard] DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING THE NATIONAL GUARD, THE MARYLAND
DEFENSE FORCE, AND STATE OPERATIONS.
(b) The Governor may order the militia into State active duty:
(1) in times of or on reasonable apprehension of imminent public crisis,
disaster, rioting, catastrophe, insurrection, invasion, tumult, or breach of peace;
(2) when martial law is declared;
(3) to enforce the laws; or
(4) to carry on any function of the militia of the State.
(c) (1) To enforce the laws, a member of the militia in State active duty has all
the authority of a peace or law enforcement officer.
(2) The authority of the member extends throughout the State during the
State active duty.
– 1 –

Ch. 97 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) DURING STATE ACTIVE DUTY, MEMBERS OF THE DEPARTMENT ARE
UNDER THE OPERATIONAL COMMAND AND CONTROL OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL,
OR ANY OFFICER OF THE NATIONAL GUARD DESIGNATED BY THE ADJUTANT
GENERAL, WHETHER THE ADJUTANT GENERAL OR DESIGNEE IS:
(1) IN STATE ACTIVE DUTY; OR
(2) IN A FEDERAL STATUS IN WHICH THE GOVERNOR IS THE
COMMANDER IN CHIEF.
[(d)] (E) Whenever the militia is in State active duty, the ranking officer of the
militia ordered into State active duty or that officer’s subordinates on State active duty
shall:
(1) cooperate with local law enforcement authorities; or
(2) if the exigencies of the case require and subject only to order from the
Governor:
(i) direct and control local law enforcement authorities and the
Department of State Police; and
(ii) assume all the powers vested in these subordinated law
enforcement authorities.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –